tests/extra.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Some tests for LOC suffix ТААҔЫ":

    хос<n><sg><px2sg><nom>        : хоһуҥ
    хос<n><sg><px2sg><acc>        : хоскун
    хос<n><sg><px2sg><loc><attr>  : хоскунааҕы
    хос<n><sg><px2sg><subst><nom> : хоскунааҕы

    күөл<n><sg><px2sg><loc><attr>  : күөлгүтүнээҕи
    күөл<n><sg><px2sg><subst><nom> : күөлгүтүнээҕи
    күөл<n><sg><loc><attr>         : күөллээҕи
    күөл<n><sg><loc><subst><nom>   : күөллээҕи

    аттаах<n><sg><acc>         : аттааҕы
    ат<n><sg><loc><attr>       : аттааҕы
    ат<n><sg><loc><subst><nom> : аттааҕы

    ап<n><sg><comp>            : аптааҕар
    аптаах<n><sg><px3sg><nom>  : аптааҕа
    аптаах<n><sg><acc>         : аптааҕы
    ап<n><sg><loc><attr>       : аптааҕы
    ап<n><sg><loc><subst><nom> : аптааҕы
    
    куорат<n><sg><loc><attr>           : куораттааҕы
    куорат<n><sg><loc><subst><sg><nom> : куораттааҕы
    куорат<n><sg><loc><subst><par>     : куораттааҕыта
    куорат<n><sg><loc><subst><comp>    : куораттааҕытааҕар

    куорат<n><sg><loc><subst><pl><nom> : куораттааҕылар 
    куорат<n><pl><loc><attr>           : куораттардааҕы
    куорат<n><pl><loc><subst><sg><nom> : куораттардааҕы
    куорат<n><sg-loc><subst><pl><nom>  : куораттардааҕылар
